Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1936
Order of remittitur deemed a final order.

Whenever in any action at law in the district court a verdict of the jury has been returned for the recovery of money and the court orders a remittitur by the prevailing party of a part of the amount of such verdict, either as a condition to allowing the verdict so reduced to stand or otherwise, such order of remittitur shall be deemed a final order from which such party may prosecute an appeal to the Court of Appeals. The provisions of this section shall not in any manner affect the rights of parties on appeal as provided for in section 25-1929.

Laws 1937, c. 45, § 1, p. 190;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1936;

R.S.1943, § 25-1936;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 65.